New Jersey, session 221, A280.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    It shall be a crime of the fourth degree for a person subject to the registration requirements set forth in P.L.1994, c.133 (C.2C:7-1 et seq.) who has committed a sex offense as defined in section 2 of P.L.1994, c.133 (C.2C:7-2) to reside within 1,000 feet of the home or workplace of the persons victim unless: a.     the person is required to serve a sentence at a jail, prison, juvenile facility, or other correctional institution or facility which is located within 1,000 feet of the victims home or workplace; b.    the person is receiving treatment at a mental health facility located within 1,000 feet of the victims home or workplace; or c.     the person established the residence prior to the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following enactment.